Washington statutes.
RCW 18.43.080

Expiration and renewals of certificates—Fees—Continuing professional development.

(1) Certificates of registration, and certificates of authorization and renewals thereof, shall expire on the last day of the month of December following their issuance or renewal and shall become invalid on that date unless renewed. It shall be the duty of the board to notify every person, firm, or corporation registered under this chapter of the date of the expiration of his or her certificate and the amount of the renewal fee that shall be required for its renewal for one year. Such notice shall be mailed at least thirty days before the end of December of each year. Renewal may be effected during the month of December by the payment of a fee determined by the board. In case any professional engineer and/or land surveyor registered under this chapter shall fail to pay the renewal fee hereinabove provided for, within ninety days from the date when the same shall become due, the renewal fee shall be the current fee plus an amount equal to one year's fee.

(2) Beginning July 1, 2007, the board may not renew a certificate of registration for a land surveyor unless the registrant verifies to the board that he or she has completed at least fifteen hours of continuing professional development per year of the registration period. By July 1, 2006, the board shall adopt rules governing continuing professional development for land surveyors that are generally patterned after the model rules of the national council of examiners for engineering and surveying.

[ 2019 c 442 s 11; 2005 c 29 s 1; 1985 c 7 s 43; 1981 c 260 s 4. Prior: 1975 1st ex.s. c 30 s 47; 1975 c 23 s 1; 1965 ex.s. c 126 s 1; 1961 c 142 s 3; 1959 c 297 s 5; 1947 c 283 s 11; Rem. Supp. 1947 s 8306-28; prior: 1935 c 167 s 10; RRS s 8306-10.]